Hawaii statutes.
[§269-174] Miscellaneous. Neither the
department nor a financing party shall be considered an electric utility or
person providing electric service by virtue of engaging in the transactions
described in this part. [L 2013, c 211, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next